Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IX.] DRUG NUISANCE ABATEMENT UNIT

[§28-131] Drug nuisance abatement unit.
(a) There is established in the department of the attorney general a drug
nuisance abatement unit.

(b) The unit shall employ such attorneys,
auditors, investigators, and other personnel as necessary to promote the
effective and efficient conduct of the unit's activities. Except for the
attorneys, all other employees of the drug nuisance abatement unit shall be
subject to chapter 76.

(c) The purpose of the drug nuisance abatement
unit shall be to provide for the effective enforcement and prosecution of those
violations of the drug nuisance abatement laws under chapter 712, part V but
only for offenses related to drugs and intoxicating compounds as provided under
chapter 712, part IV. The drug nuisance [abatement] unit may also review and
take appropriate action on drug nuisance complaints of any citizen of the
State, or drug nuisances that are discovered by the unit in carrying out its
activities. [L 2003, c 63, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next